Missouri, session 2026, SB1454.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 191.480, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 191.480,
to read as follows:
191.480. 1. For purposes of this section, the
following terms shall mean:
(1) "Eligible patient", a person who meets all of the
following:
(a) Has a terminal condition or illness, a life-
threatening condition or illness, or a severely debilitating
condition or illness;
(b) Has considered all other treatment options
currently approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration and all relevant clinical trials conducted in
this state;
(c) Has received a prescription or recommendation from
the person's physician for an investigational drug,
biological product, or device;
(d) Has given written informed consent which shall be
at least as comprehensive as the consent used in clinical
trials for the use of the investigational drug, biological
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1454 2
product, or device or, if the patient is a minor or lacks
the mental capacity to provide informed consent, a parent or
legal guardian has given written informed consent on the
patient's behalf; and
(e) Has documentation from the person's physician that
the person has met the requirements of this subdivision;
(2) "Investigational drug, biological product, or
device", a drug, biological product, or device, any of which
are used to treat the patient's terminal condition or
illness, life-threatening condition or illness, or severely
debilitating condition or illness, that has successfully
completed phase one of a clinical trial but has not been
approved for general use by the United States Food and Drug
Administration and remains under investigation in a clinical
trial[. The term shall not include Schedule I controlled
substances];
(3) "Life-threatening condition or illness", a disease
or condition:
(a) Where the likelihood of death is high unless the
course of the disease or condition is interrupted; and
(b) With potentially fatal outcomes, where the end
point of clinical trial analysis is survival;
(4) "Severely debilitating condition or illness", a
disease or condition that causes major irreversible
morbidity;
(5) "Terminal condition or illness", a disease or
condition that without life-sustaining procedures will
result in death in the near future or a state of permanent
unconsciousness from which recovery is unlikely.
2. A manufacturer of an investigational drug,
biological product, or device may make available the
manufacturer's investigational drug, biological product, or

SB 1454 3
device to eligible patients under this section. This
section does not require that a manufacturer make available
an investigational drug, biological product, or device to an
eligible patient. A manufacturer may:
(1) Provide an investigational drug, biological
product, or device to an eligible patient without receiving
compensation; or
(2) Require an eligible patient to pay the costs of or
associated with the manufacture of the investigational drug,
biological product, or device.
3. This section does not require a health care insurer
to provide coverage for the cost of any investigational
drug, biological product, or device. A health care insurer
may provide coverage for an investigational drug, biological
product, or device.
4. This section does not require the department of
corrections to provide coverage for the cost of any
investigational drug, biological product, or device.
5. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, no state agency or regulatory board shall revoke,
fail to renew, or take any other action against a
physician's license issued under chapter 334 based solely on
the physician's recommendation to an eligible patient
regarding prescription for or treatment with an
investigational drug, biological product, or device. Action
against a health care provider's Medicare certification
based solely on the health care provider's recommendation
that a patient have access to an investigational drug,
biological product, or device is prohibited.
6. If a provision of this section or its application
to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications

SB 1454 4
of this section that can be given effect without the invalid
provision or application, and to this end the provisions of
this section are severable.
7. If the clinical trial is closed due to lack of
efficacy or toxicity, the drug shall not be offered. If
notice is given on a drug, product, or device taken by a
patient outside of a clinical trial, the pharmaceutical
company or patient's physician shall notify the patient of
the information from the safety committee of the clinical
trial.
8. Except in the case of gross negligence or willful
misconduct, any person who manufactures, imports,
distributes, prescribes, dispenses, or administers an
investigational drug or device to an eligible patient with a
terminal condition or illness, a life-threatening condition
or illness, or a severely debilitating condition or illness
in accordance with this section shall not be liable in any
action under state law for any loss, damage, or injury
100 arising out of, relating to, or resulting from:
101 (1) The design, development, clinical testing and
102 investigation, manufacturing, labeling, distribution, sale,
103 purchase, donation, dispensing, prescription,
104 administration, or use of the drug or device; or
105 (2) The safety or effectiveness of the drug or device.
✓